Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Slum Clearance and Redevelopment Act.
Sec. 18.55.950.
Definitions.

In AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“area of operation” means the State of Alaska;

“blighted area” means an area, other than a slum area, that by reason of the predominance of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, unsanitary or unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or improvements, tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land, improper subdivision or obsolete platting, or the existence of conditions that endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of these factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of the municipality, retards the provision of housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its condition and use;

“bond” means any bond, note, interim certificate, debenture, or other obligation issued by the corporation under AS

18.55.570

;

“corporation” means the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation;

“dwelling” means a building or structure or part of a building or structure used and occupied for human habitation or intended to be so used, and includes an appurtenance belonging to the building or structure or usually enjoyed with it;

“federal government” includes the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America;

“governing body” means the legislative body of a municipality;

“obligee” includes a bondholder, agent or trustee for a bondholder, or lessor demising to the corporation property used in connection with a redevelopment project, or an assignee of the lessor’s interest or a part of the interest, and the federal government when it is a party to a contract with the corporation;

“public body” means the state or a municipality;

“real property” includes all land, including improvements and fixtures on it, and property of any nature appurtenant to it, or used in connection with it, and every estate, interest, and right, legal or equitable, in it, including a term for years, a lien, and indebtedness secured by a lien;

“redeveloper” means a person, partnership, or public or private corporation or agency that enters or proposes to enter into a redevelopment contract;

“redevelopment contract” means a contract between the corporation and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area in accordance with a redevelopment plan;

“redevelopment plan” means a plan, other than a preliminary or tentative plan, for the acquisition, clearance, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or future use of a redevelopment project area;

“redevelopment project” includes the preparation of a redevelopment plan, the planning, survey, and other work incident to a redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and arrangements for carrying out a redevelopment project, and means a work or undertaking

to acquire all or a portion of a slum area or a blighted area, including lands, structures, or improvements that are necessary or incidental to the clearance or redevelopment of the area or to the prevention of the spread or recurrence of slum conditions or conditions of blight;

to clear a slum or blight area by demolishing or removing buildings, structures, streets, utilities, or other improvements and to install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities, and site improvements necessary to prepare sites for use in accordance with a redevelopment plan;

to sell, lease, or otherwise make available land in a slum or blight area for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other use or for public use or to retain the land for public use, in accordance with a redevelopment plan;

“slum area” means an area where buildings predominate that, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or overcrowding, lack of ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or the existence of conditions that endanger life or property by fire or other causes, or a combination of these factors, is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, and crime, and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals or welfare.

History.

(§ 3 ch 105 SLA 1951; § 29(a) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 84 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1965; am § 40 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 31 ch 37 SLA 1986; am §§ 73, 140 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 38 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, former paragraphs (11)-(18) were renumbered as (10)-(17) to reflect the repeal of former (10) in 1985.
In 1992, former paragraphs (3) and (4) were renumbered as (2) and (3), former (6)-(8) renumbered as (5)-(7), and former (10)-(17) renumbered as (8)-(15), to reflect the repeal of former (2), (5), and (9) in 1992.
Paragraph (4) enacted as (18).
Renumbered in 1992.
Also in 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in paragraphs (3), (8), and (12).

Sec. 18.55.960.
Short title.

AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

may be cited as the Slum Clearance and Redevelopment Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 1951)

Secs. 18.55.970 — 18.55.990.
Planning assistance.
[Repealed,
§ 10 ch 200 SLA 1972.]